Alaska, session 34, HB288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.03.260(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) A local school board shall provide an approved charter school with an 06 annual program budget. The budget shall be not less than the amount generated by the 07 students enrolled in the charter school less administrative costs retained by the local 08 school district, determined by applying the indirect cost rate approved by the 09 department up to four percent. Costs directly related to charter school facilities, 10 including rent, utilities, and maintenance, may not be included in an annual program 11 budget for the purposes of calculating the four percent cap on administrative costs 12 under this subsection. A local school board shall provide a charter school with a report 13 itemizing the administrative costs retained by the local school board under this section. 14 The "amount generated by students enrolled in the charter school" is to be determined 01 in the same manner as it would be for a student enrolled in another public school in 02 that school district and includes funds generated by grants, appropriations, federal 03 impact aid, the required local contribution, the voluntary local contribution under 04 AS 14.17.410(c), special needs under AS 14.17.420(a)(1), and secondary school 05 vocational and technical instruction under AS 14.17.420(a)(3). A school district shall 06 direct state aid under AS 14.11 for the construction or major maintenance of a charter 07 school facility to the charter school that generated the state aid, subject to the same 08 terms and conditions that apply to state aid under AS 14.11 for construction or major 09 maintenance of a school facility that is not a charter school. 10 * Sec. 2. AS 14.17.410(c) is amended to read: 11 (c) In addition to the local contribution required under (b)(2) of this section, a 12 city or borough school district in a fiscal year may make a voluntary local 13 contribution in any amount [OF NOT MORE THAN THE GREATER OF 14 (1) THE EQUIVALENT OF A TWO MILL TAX LEVY ON THE 15 FULL AND TRUE VALUE OF THE TAXABLE REAL AND PERSONAL 16 PROPERTY IN THE DISTRICT AS OF JANUARY 1 OF THE SECOND 17 PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF 18 COMMERCE, COMMUNITY, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT UNDER 19 AS 14.17.510 AND AS 29.45.110; OR 20 (2) 23 PERCENT OF THE TOTAL OF THE DISTRICT'S BASIC 21 NEED FOR THE FISCAL YEAR UNDER (b)(1) OF THIS SECTION AND ANY 22 ADDITIONAL FUNDING DISTRIBUTED TO THE DISTRICT IN A FISCAL 23 YEAR ACCORDING TO (b) OF THIS SECTION]. 24 * Sec. 3. AS 14.17.990(6) is amended to read: 25 (6) "local contribution" means appropriations and the value of in-kind 26 services made by a district for any purpose; 27 * Sec. 4. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.